Utah statutes.
77-34-5.   Contracts supplemental to compact authorized.

The appropriate official of a party state may supplement but in no way abrogate the provisions of this compact through one or more contracts with any other party state for the furlough of inmates. The contracts may provide for:

(1)  Duration;

(2)  Terms and conditions of the furlough;

(3)  Report of violations and escapes by furloughees;

(4)  Costs, if any, to be incurred;

(5)  Delivery and retaining of furloughees; and

(6)  Other matters as may be necessary and appropriate to fix the jurisdictions, obligations, responsibilities, liabilities, and rights of the sending and receiving states.

